Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
OFFICERS

7-128-301. Officers.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, a nonprofit corporation shall have a president, a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as may be designated by the board of directors. An officer shall be an individual who is eighteen years of age or older. An officer need not be a director or a member of the nonprofit corporation, unless the bylaws so prescribe.

Officers may be appointed by the board of directors or in such other manner as the board of directors or bylaws may provide. A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to the secretary or to one or more other persons responsibility for the preparation and maintenance of minutes of the directors' and members' meetings and other records and information required to be kept by the nonprofit corporation under section 7-136-101 and for authenticating records of the nonprofit corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in the nonprofit corporation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 696, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1511, § 300, effective July 1.

7-128-302. Duties of officers.

Each officer shall have the authority and shall perform the duties stated with respect to such office in the bylaws or, to the extent not inconsistent with the bylaws, prescribed with respect to such office by the board of directors or by an officer authorized by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 697, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2342, § 307, effective July 1, 2004.

7-128-303. Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by giving written notice of resignation to the nonprofit corporation.

A resignation of an officer is effective when the notice is received by the nonprofit corporation unless the notice states a later effective date.

If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board of directors may permit the officer to remain in office until the effective date and may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date with the provision that the successor does not take office until the effective date, or the board of directors may remove the officer at any time before the effective date and may fill the resulting vacancy.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause. The bylaws or the board of directors may make provisions for the removal of officers by other officers or by the voting members.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 697, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(5) amended, p. 984, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1855, § 140, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1720, § 142, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2342, § 308, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(5) repealed, p. 1511, § 301, effective July 1.

7-128-304. Contract rights with respect to officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the nonprofit corporation. An officer's resignation does not affect the nonprofit corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 697, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.